Maine, session 132, LD1949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §103-B is enacted to read:
§103-B. Affordability impact considerations
In executing its duties, powers and regulatory functions under this Title, the
commission, while ensuring system reliability, shall consider the impact on affordability
for residential customers.
Sec. 2. Credit and collection data; publication. The Public Utilities
Commission shall publish on its publicly accessible website data regarding credit and
collection activities of a transmission and distribution utility with more than 50,000
customers that is submitted to the commission by the utility in accordance with rules
adopted by the commission pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section
704, subsection 1. The commission shall ensure that the data is provided on the
commission's publicly accessible website in a clear and transparent manner.
Sec. 3. Comprehensive review of electric delivery rates. The Public Utilities
Commission shall conduct a comprehensive review of each component of electric delivery
rates. In conducting the review required pursuant to this section, the commission shall
consider whether changes to the current design and composition of electric delivery rates
could be implemented to, at a minimum:
1. Contain customer costs;
2. Reduce transmission and distribution utility bill volatility; and
3. Increase transmission and distribution utility bill transparency.
The commission shall engage stakeholders in the review process under this section and
solicit stakeholder feedback. By January 31, 2027, the commission shall submit an interim
report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy
matters informing the committee of its work to date on the comprehensive review. By
December 15, 2027, the commission shall submit a final report regarding its comprehensive
review, including any recommendations or proposed legislation, to the joint standing
Page 1 - 132LR2159(10)

committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters. The committee may
report out a bill related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature.
Sec. 4. Affordability metric development. The Public Utilities Commission
shall develop an affordability metric to be used to assess the impact of electricity bills on
the overall energy burden for residential customers of an investor-owned transmission and
distribution utility. By January 15, 2027, the commission shall submit an interim report on
the commission's progress under this section to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over energy matters. The commission shall submit a final
report by December 15, 2027 to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over energy matters regarding the development of an affordability metric under
this section, along with any recommendations or proposed legislation, if necessary. The
committee may report out a bill related to the final report to the Second Regular Session of
the 133rd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR2159(10)